tutorial/morphology/Finnish-02/finnish.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun                ! POS
+Verb                ! POS

!! LEXICON Verb-Infl-I

+InfA
+1_Sg
+2_Sg
+1_Pl
+2_Pl
+3_Pl

!! LEXICON Noun-Infl-I

+Nom
+Gen
+Ine
+Ade
+All
+Ela
+Abl
+Ess
+Tra

!! %>                        !! morpheme boundary (Apertium)

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Root

Noun-stems ;
Verb-stems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Clitics

# ;
+Interrog:ko    # ;
+Emphatic:kin   # ;
+Negative:kaan  # ;


LEXICON Verb-Infl-I

+InfA:%>a   Clitics ;
+1_Sg:%>n   Clitics ;
+2_Sg:%>t   Clitics ;
+1_Pl:%>mme Clitics ;
+2_Pl:%>tte Clitics ;
+3_Pl:%>vat Clitics ;

!! for VERB-FR class: verbs with no back vowels
!!  LEXICON Verb-Infl-FR
!!  
!!  +InfA:ä # ;
!!  +1_Sg:n # ;
!!  +2_Sg:t # ;
!!  +1_Pl:mme # ;
!!  +2_Pl:tte # ;
!!  +3_Pl:vät # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-Infl-I

!! OK too: 
!! +Nom:    # ; !!                       Nominative

+Nom:%>0    Clitics ; !!                       Nominative
+Gen:%>n    Clitics ; !! of                 !! Genitive
+Ine:%>ssa  Clitics ; !! in                 !! Inessive 
+Ade:%>lla  Clitics ; !! at                 !! Adessive 
+All:%>lle  Clitics ; !! onto               !! Allative 
+Ela:%>sta  Clitics ; !! out-of from-within !! Elative
+Abl:%>lta  Clitics ; !! from               !! Ablative 
+Ess:%>na   Clitics ; !! as                 !! Essive
+Tra:%>ksi  Clitics ; !! as-into            !! Translative


!!  LEXICON Noun-Infl-FR
!!  
!!  +Nom:0    # ; !!                       Nominative
!!  +Gen:n    # ; !! of                 !! Genitive
!!  +Ine:ssä  # ; !! in                 !! Inessive 
!!  +Ade:llä  # ; !! at                 !! Adessive 
!!  +All:lle  # ; !! onto               !! Allative 
!!  +Ela:stä  # ; !! out-of from-within !! Elative
!!  +Abl:ltä  # ; !! from               !! Ablative 
!!  +Ess:nä   # ; !! as                 !! Essive
!!  +Tra:ksi  # ; !! as-into            !! Translative


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-stems

talo+Noun:talo    Noun-Infl-I ;   ! (house)
pala+Noun:pala    Noun-Infl-I ;   ! (piece)
savu+Noun:savu    Noun-Infl-I ;   ! (smoke)

isä+Noun:isä      Noun-Infl-I ;  ! (father)
hissi+Noun:hissi  Noun-Infl-I ;  ! (lift)


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-stems

palaa+Verb:pala    Verb-Infl-I ;   ! (burn)
ajaa+Verb:aja      Verb-Infl-I ;   ! (drive)

kysyä+Verb:kysy    Verb-Infl-I ;  ! (ask)
kestää+Verb:kestä  Verb-Infl-I ;  ! (last)
